California statutes. Civil Code
(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 56.10, a provider of health care, health care service plan, or contractor shall not release medical information to persons or entities who have requested that information and who are authorized by law to receive that information pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56.10, if the information is related to an individual seeking or obtaining gender-affirming health care or gender-affirming mental health care or to a person or entity allowing a child to receive gender-affirming health care or gender-affirming mental health care, and the information is being requested pursuant to another state’s law that authorizes a person to bring a civil or criminal action against a person or entity that provides, seeks, obtains, or receives gender-affirming health care or gender-affirming mental health care or who allows a child to receive gender-affirming health care or gender-affirming mental health care.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 56.10 or subdivision (c) of Section 56.20, a provider of health care, health care service plan, contractor, or employer shall not cooperate with any inquiry or investigation by, or provide medical information to, any individual, agency, or department from another state or, to the extent permitted by federal law, to a federal law enforcement agency that would identify an individual and that is related to an individual seeking or obtaining gender-affirming health care or gender-affirming mental health care that is lawful under the laws of this state.

(d) This section does not prohibit compliance with the investigation of activity that is punishable as a crime under the laws of this state.

(e) This section does not prohibit compliance with an audit or investigation of
 activity that is unlawful under the laws of this state or federal law, or with an audit, review, or investigation conducted for purposes of licensure, registration, accreditation, or certification under the laws of this state or federal law or pursuant to an accrediting organization recognized by the State Department of Public Health or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(f) This section does not prohibit the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation from disclosing medical information of an individual to a health care facility that is run by an agency or department from another state, or to a federal law enforcement agency, for treatment purposes and direct medical care for the specified individual and is narrowly limited to the request.

(g) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Gender-affirming health care” and “gender-affirming mental health care” shall have the same meanings as provided in Section 16010.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) “Person” means an individual or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 764, Sec. 2.   (SB 497)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56.110.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 56.10, a provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, contractor, or employer shall not knowingly disclose, transmit, transfer, share, or grant access to medical information in an electronic health records system or through a health information exchange that would identify an individual and that is related to an individual seeking, obtaining, providing, supporting, or aiding in the performance of an abortion that is lawful under the laws of this state to any individual or entity from another state, unless the disclosure, transmittal, transfer, sharing, or granting of access is authorized under any of the following conditions:

(1) In accordance with a valid, written authorization
 pursuant to Section 56.11 that clearly states that medical information on abortion or abortion-related services may be disclosed, and only to the extent and for the purposes expressly stated in the authorization.

(2) In accordance with paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10, to the extent necessary to allow responsibility for payment to be determined and payment to be made or to the extent that it is not further disclosed by the recipient in a way that would violate this part.

(3) In accordance with paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10 for the purpose of accreditation, in reviewing the competence or qualifications of health care professionals, or in reviewing health care services with respect to medical necessity, level of care, quality of care, or justification of charges.

(4) In accordance with paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10, for the purpose of bona fide research. Institutional Review Boards shall consider the potential harm to the patient and the patient’s privacy when the research uses data that contains information related to abortion or abortion-related services and the research is performed out of state.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the content of the health records containing medical information described in subdivision (a) shall be disclosed to any of the following:

(1) A patient, or their personal representative, consistent with the Patient Access to Health Records Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 123100) of Part 1 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) In response to an order of a California or federal court, but
 only to the extent clearly stated in the order and consistent with Section 1543 of the Penal Code, if applicable, and only if all information about the patient’s identity and records are protected from public scrutiny through mechanisms, including, but not limited to, a sealed proceeding or court record.

(3) When expressly required by federal law that preempts California law, but only to the extent expressly required.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, contractor, or employer from cooperating or complying with the investigation of activity that is punishable as a crime under the laws of California, and that took place in California.

(d) A provider of health care, as defined in Section 56.05, shall not be subject to liability for
 damages or to civil or enforcement actions, including disciplinary actions, fines, or penalties, for failure to meet the requirements of this section before January 31, 2027, if the provider of health care is working diligently and in good faith to come into compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 11.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56.11.

(a) Any person or entity that wishes to obtain medical information pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56.10, other than a person or entity authorized to receive medical information pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 56.10, except as provided in paragraph (21) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10, shall obtain a valid authorization for the release of this information.

(b) An authorization for the release of medical information by a provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, or contractor shall be valid if it meets the following conditions:

(1) Is handwritten or is in a typeface no smaller than 14-point type.

(2) Is clearly separate from any other language present on the same page and is executed by a signature that serves no other purpose than to execute the authorization.

(3) Is signed, including with an electronic or handwritten signature, and dated by one of the following:

(A) The patient. A patient who is a minor may only sign an authorization for the release of medical information obtained by a provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, or contractor in the course of furnishing services to which the minor could lawfully have consented under Part 4 (commencing with Section 6900) of Division 11 of the Family Code.

(B) The legal representative of the patient, if the patient is a minor or lacks the capacity to make the decision to
 authorize the release of medical information. However, authorization may not be given under this subdivision for the disclosure of medical information obtained by the provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, or contractor in the course of furnishing services to which a minor patient could lawfully have consented under Part 4 (commencing with Section 6900) of Division 11 of the Family Code.

(C) The spouse of the patient or the person financially responsible for the patient, where the medical information is being sought for the sole purpose of processing an application for health insurance or for enrollment in a nonprofit hospital plan, a health care service plan, or an employee benefit plan, and where the patient is to be an enrolled spouse or dependent under the policy or plan.

(D) The beneficiary, as defined in Section 24 of the Probate Code, or
 personal representative, as defined in Section 58 of the Probate Code, of a deceased patient.

(4) States the specific uses and limitations on the types of medical information to be disclosed.

(5) States the name or functions of the provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, or contractor that may disclose the medical information.

(6) States the name or functions of the persons or entities authorized to receive the medical information.

(7) States the specific uses and limitations on the use of the medical information by the persons or entities authorized to receive the medical information.

(8) States an expiration date or event. The expiration date or event
 shall limit the duration of the authorization to one year or less, unless the person signing the authorization requests a specific date beyond a year or unless the authorization is related to an approved clinical trial, as defined in Section 1370.6 of the Health and Safety Code, or medical research study, in which case the authorization may extend beyond one year if the expiration date or event extends no longer than the completion of the relevant clinical trial or research study.

(9) Advises the person signing the authorization of the right to receive a copy of the authorization.

(c) If a provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, contractor, or any other entity seeks an authorization from an individual for a use or disclosure of protected health information, the provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, contractor,
 or other entity shall provide the individual with a copy of the signed authorization, and instructions on how to access additional copies or a digital version of the signed authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 374, Sec. 2.   (AB 1697)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

56.12.

Upon demand by the patient or the person who signed an authorization, a provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, or contractor possessing the authorization shall furnish a true copy thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 853, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

56.13.

A recipient of medical information pursuant to an authorization as provided by this chapter or pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 56.10 may not further disclose that medical information except in accordance with a new authorization that meets the requirements of Section 56.11, or as specifically required or permitted by other provisions of this chapter or by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

56.14.

A provider of health care, health care service plan, or contractor that discloses medical information pursuant to the authorizations required by this chapter shall communicate to the person or entity to which it discloses the medical information any limitations in the authorization regarding the use of the medical information. No provider of health care, health care service plan, or contractor that has attempted in good faith to comply with this provision shall be liable for any unauthorized use of the medical information by the person or entity to which the
 provider, plan, or contractor disclosed the medical information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 526, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

56.15.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prevent a person who could sign the authorization pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56.11 from cancelling or modifying an authorization. However, the cancellation or modification shall be effective only after the provider of health care actually receives written notice of the cancellation or modification.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

56.16.

For disclosures not addressed by Section 56.1007, unless there is a specific written request by the patient to the contrary, nothing in this part shall be construed to prevent a general acute care hospital, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, upon an inquiry concerning a specific patient, from releasing at its discretion any of the following information: the patient’s name, address,
 age, and sex; a general description of the reason for treatment (whether an injury, a burn, poisoning, or some unrelated condition); the general nature of the injury, burn, poisoning, or other condition; the general condition of the patient; and any information that is not medical information as defined in Section 56.05.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 444, Sec. 5.   (SB 138)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Disclosure of Genetic Test Results by a Health Care Service Plan [56.17. - 56.17.]

56.17.

(a) This section shall apply to the disclosure of genetic test results by a health care service plan that are contained in an applicant’s or enrollee’s medical records.

(b) Any person who negligently discloses results of a test for a genetic characteristic to any third party in a manner that identifies or provides identifying characteristics of the person to whom the test results apply, except pursuant to a written authorization as described in subdivision (g), shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) plus court costs, as determined by the court, which penalty and costs shall be paid to the subject of the test.

(c) Any person who willfully discloses the results of a test for a genetic characteristic to any third party in a manner that identifies or provides identifying characteristics of the person to whom the test results apply, except pursuant to a written authorization as described in subdivision (g), shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and no more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) plus court costs, as determined by the court, which penalty and costs shall be paid to the subject of the test.

(d) Any person who willfully or negligently discloses the results of a test for a genetic characteristic to a third party in a manner that identifies or provides identifying characteristics of the person to whom the test results apply, except pursuant to a written authorization as described in subdivision (g), that results in economic, bodily, or emotional harm to the subject of the test, is
 guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(e) In addition to the penalties listed in subdivisions (b) and (c), any person who commits any act described in subdivision (b) or (c) shall be liable to the subject for all actual damages, including damages for economic, bodily, or emotional harm which is proximately caused by the act.

(f) Each disclosure made in violation of this section is a separate and actionable offense.

(g) The applicant’s “written authorization,” as used in this section, shall satisfy the following requirements:

(1) Is written in plain language and is in a typeface no smaller than 14-point type.

(2) Is dated and signed,
 including with an electronic or handwritten signature, by the individual or a person authorized to act on behalf of the individual.

(3) Specifies the types of persons authorized to disclose information about the individual.

(4) Specifies the nature of the information authorized to be disclosed.

(5) States the name or functions of the persons or entities authorized to receive the information.

(6) Specifies the purposes for which the information is collected.

(7) Specifies the length of time the authorization shall remain valid or states an expiration date or event. The expiration date or event shall limit the duration of the authorization to one year or less, unless the person signing the
 authorization requests a specific date beyond a year or unless the authorization is related to an approved clinical trial, as defined in Section 1370.6 of the Health and Safety Code, or medical research study, in which case the authorization may extend beyond one year if the expiration date or event extends no longer than the completion of the relevant clinical trial or research study.

(8) Advises the person signing the authorization of the right to receive a copy of the authorization. Written authorization is required for each separate disclosure of the test results.

(h) If a provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, contractor, or any other entity seeks an authorization from an individual for a use or disclosure of protected health information, the provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, contractor, or other
 entity shall provide the individual with a copy of the signed authorization and instructions on how to access additional copies or a digital version of the signed authorization.

(i) This section shall not apply to disclosures required by the State Department of Health Care Services necessary to monitor compliance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 124975) of Part 5 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, nor to disclosures required by the Department of Managed Health Care necessary to administer and enforce compliance with Section 1374.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(j) For purposes of this section, “genetic characteristic” has the same meaning as that set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 1374.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 374, Sec. 3.   (AB 1697)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.6. Genetic Privacy [56.18. - 56.186.]

56.18.

(a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Genetic Information Privacy Act.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply: 

(1) “Affirmative authorization” means an action that demonstrates an intentional decision by the consumer.

(2) “Biological sample” means any material part of the human, discharge therefrom, or derivative thereof, such as tissue, blood, urine, or saliva, known to contain deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA).

(3) “Consumer” means a natural person who is a California resident.

(4) “Dark pattern” means a user interface designed or manipulated with the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decisionmaking, or choice.

(5) “Direct-to-consumer genetic testing company” means an entity that does any of the following:

(A) Sells, markets, interprets, or otherwise offers consumer-initiated genetic testing products or services directly to consumers.

(B) Analyzes genetic data obtained from a consumer, except to the extent that the analysis is performed by a person licensed in the healing arts for diagnosis or treatment of a medical condition.

(C) Collects, uses, maintains, or discloses genetic data collected or derived from a direct-to-consumer genetic
 testing product or service, or is directly provided by a consumer.

(6) “Express consent” means a consumer’s affirmative authorization to grant permission in response to a clear, meaningful, and prominent notice regarding the collection, use, maintenance, or disclosure of genetic data for a specific purpose. The nature of the data collection, use, maintenance, or disclosure shall be conveyed in clear and prominent terms in such a manner that an ordinary consumer would notice and understand it. Express consent cannot be inferred from inaction. Agreement obtained through use of dark patterns does not constitute consent.

(7) (A) “Genetic data” means any data, regardless of its format, that results from the analysis of a biological sample from a consumer, or from another element enabling equivalent information to be obtained, and concerns genetic material. Genetic
 material includes, but is not limited to, deoxyribonucleic acids (DNA), ribonucleic acids (RNA), genes, chromosomes, alleles, genomes, alterations or modifications to DNA or RNA, single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), uninterpreted data that results from the analysis of the biological sample, and any information extrapolated, derived, or inferred therefrom.

(B) “Genetic data” does not include deidentified data. For purposes of this subparagraph, “deidentified data” means data that cannot be used to infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, a particular individual, provided that the business that possesses the information does all of the following:

(i) Takes reasonable measures to ensure that the information cannot be associated with a consumer or household.

(ii) Publicly commits to maintain and use the
 information only in deidentified form and not to attempt to reidentify the information, except that the business may attempt to reidentify the information solely for the purpose of determining whether its deidentification processes satisfy the requirements of this subparagraph, provided that the business does not use or disclose any information reidentified in this process and destroys the reidentified information upon completion of that assessment.

(iii) Contractually obligates any recipients of the information to take reasonable measures to ensure that the information cannot be associated with a consumer or household and to commit to maintaining and using the information only in deidentified form and not to reidentify the information.

(C) “Genetic data” does not include data or a biological sample to the extent that data or a biological sample is collected, used, maintained, and
 disclosed exclusively for scientific research conducted by an investigator with an institution that holds an assurance with the United States Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Part 46 (commencing with Section 46.101) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, in compliance with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations for the protection of human subjects in research, including, but not limited to, the Common Rule pursuant to Part 46 (commencing with Section 46.101) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, United States Food and Drug Administration regulations pursuant to Parts 50 and 56 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), and the Protection of Human Subjects in Medical Experimentation Act, Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 24170) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) “Genetic testing” means any
 laboratory test of a biological sample from a consumer for the purpose of determining information concerning genetic material contained within the biological sample, or any information extrapolated, derived, or inferred therefrom.

(9) “Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, business, business trust, or legal representative of an organization.

(10) “Service provider” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association, or other legal entity that is organized or operated for the profit or financial benefit of its shareholders or other owners, that is involved in the collection, transportation, and analysis of the consumer’s biological sample or extracted genetic material on behalf of the direct-to-consumer genetic testing company, or on behalf of any other company that collects, uses, maintains, or discloses
 genetic data collected or derived from a direct-to-consumer genetic testing product or service, or is directly provided by a consumer, or the delivery of the results of the analysis of the biological sample or genetic material. The contract between the company and the service provider shall prohibit the service provider from retaining, using, or disclosing the biological sample, extracted genetic material, genetic data, or any information regarding the identity of the consumer, including whether that consumer has solicited or received genetic testing, as applicable, for any purpose other than for the specific purpose of performing the services specified in the contract for the business, including both of the following:

(A) A provision prohibiting the service provider from retaining, using, or disclosing the biological sample, extracted genetic material, genetic data, or any information regarding the identity of the consumer, including whether
 that consumer has solicited or received genetic testing, as applicable, for a commercial purpose other than providing the services specified in the contract with the business.

(B) A provision prohibiting the service provider from associating or combining the biological sample, extracted genetic material, genetic data, or any information regarding the identity of the consumer, including whether that consumer has solicited or received genetic testing, as applicable, with information the service provider has received from or on behalf of another person or persons, or has collected from its own interaction with consumers or as required by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 596, Sec. 2.   (SB 41)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

56.181.

(a) To safeguard the privacy, confidentiality, security, and integrity of a consumer’s genetic data, a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company shall do both of the following:

(1) Provide clear and complete information regarding the company’s policies and procedures for the collection, use, maintenance, and disclosure, as applicable, of genetic data by making available to a consumer all of the following:

(A) A summary of its privacy practices, written in plain language, that includes information about the company’s collection, use, maintenance, and disclosure, as applicable, of genetic data.

(B) A prominent and
 easily accessible privacy notice that includes, at a minimum, complete information about the company’s data collection, consent, use, access, disclosure, maintenance, transfer, security, and retention and deletion practices, and information that clearly describes how to file a complaint alleging a violation of this chapter, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56.182.

(C) A notice that the consumer’s deidentified genetic or phenotypic information may be shared with or disclosed to third parties for research purposes in accordance with Part 46 (commencing with Section 46.101) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) Obtain a consumer’s express consent for collection, use, and disclosure of the consumer’s genetic data, including, at a minimum, separate and express consent for each of the following:

(A) The
 use of the genetic data collected through the genetic testing product or service offered to the consumer, including who has access to genetic data, and how genetic data may be shared, and the specific purposes for which it will be collected, used, and disclosed.

(B) The storage of a consumer’s biological sample after the initial testing requested by the consumer has been fulfilled.

(C) Each use of genetic data or the biological sample beyond the primary purpose of the genetic testing or service and inherent contextual uses. 

(D) Each transfer or disclosure of the consumer’s genetic data or biological sample to a third party other than to a service provider, including the name of the third party to which the consumer’s genetic data or biological sample will be transferred or disclosed.

(E) (i) The marketing or facilitation of marketing to a consumer based on the consumer’s genetic data or the marketing or facilitation of marketing by a third party based upon the consumer having ordered, purchased, received, or used a genetic testing product or service.

(ii) This subparagraph does not require a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company to obtain a consumer’s express consent to market to the consumer on the company’s own website or mobile application based upon the consumer having ordered, purchased, received, or used a genetic testing product or service from that company if the content of the advertisement does not depend upon any information specific to that consumer, except for the product or service that the consumer ordered, purchased, received, or used, and the placement of the advertisement is not intended to result in disparate exposure
 to advertising content on the basis of any characteristic specified in Section 51. Nothing in this subparagraph alters, limits, or negates the requirements of any other antidiscrimination law or targeted advertising law.

(iii) Any advertisement of a third-party product or service presented to a consumer pursuant to either clause (i) or (ii) shall be prominently labeled as advertising content and be accompanied by the name of any third party that has contributed to the placement of the advertising. If applicable, the advertisement also shall clearly indicate that the advertised product or service, and any associated claims, have not been vetted or endorsed by the direct-to-consumer genetic testing company. 

(F) For the purpose of this paragraph, “third party” does not include a public or private nonprofit postsecondary educational institution to the extent that the consumer’s
 genetic data or biological sample is disclosed to a public or private nonprofit postsecondary educational institution for the purpose of scientific research or educational activities as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 56.184.

(b) A company that is subject to the requirements described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall provide effective mechanisms, without any unnecessary steps, for a consumer to revoke their consent after it is given, at least one of which utilizes the primary medium through which the company communicates with consumers.

(c) If a consumer revokes the consent that they provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the company shall honor the consumer’s consent revocation as soon as practicable, but not later than 30 days after the individual revokes consent, in accordance with both of the following:

(1) Revocation of consent under this section shall comply with Part 46 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. 

(2) The company shall destroy a consumer’s biological sample within 30 days of receipt of revocation of consent to store the sample.

(d) The direct-to-consumer genetic testing company shall do both of the following: 

(1) Implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices to protect a consumer’s genetic data against unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.

(2) Develop procedures and practices to enable a consumer to easily do any of the following:

(A) Access the
 consumer’s genetic data.

(B) Delete the consumer’s account and genetic data, except for genetic data that is required to be retained by the company to comply with applicable legal and regulatory requirements.

(C) Have the consumer’s biological sample destroyed.

(e) A person or public entity shall not discriminate against a consumer because the consumer exercised any of the consumer’s rights under this chapter by doing any of the following, including, but not limited to:

(1) Denying goods, services, or benefits to the customer.

(2) Charging different prices or rates for goods or services, including through the use of discounts or other incentives or imposing penalties.

(3) Providing a different level or quality of goods, services, or benefits to the consumer.

(4) Suggesting that the consumer will receive a different price or rate for goods, services, or benefits, or a different level or quality of goods, services, or benefits.

(5) Considering the consumer’s exercise of rights under this chapter as a basis for suspicion of criminal wrongdoing or unlawful conduct.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, and except as provided in paragraph (2), a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company shall not disclose a consumer’s genetic data to any entity that is responsible for administering or making decisions regarding health insurance, life insurance, long-term care insurance,
 disability insurance, or employment or to any entity that provides advice to an entity that is responsible for performing those functions.

(2) A direct-to-consumer genetic testing company may disclose a consumer’s genetic data or biological sample to an entity described in paragraph (1) if all of the following are true:

(A) The entity is not primarily engaged in administering health insurance, life insurance, long-term care insurance, disability insurance, or employment.

(B) The consumer’s genetic data or biological sample is not disclosed to the entity in that entity’s capacity as a party that is responsible for administering, advising, or making decisions regarding health insurance, life insurance, long-term care insurance, disability insurance, or employment.

(C) Any agent or division of the entity that is involved in administering, advising, or making decisions regarding health insurance, life insurance, long-term care insurance, disability insurance, or employment is prohibited from accessing the consumer’s genetic data or biological sample.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 596, Sec. 2.   (SB 41)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

56.182.

(a) Any person who negligently violates this chapter shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) plus court costs, as determined by the court.

(b) Any person who willfully violates this chapter shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) plus court costs, as determined by the court.

(c) Actions for relief pursuant to this chapter shall be prosecuted exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction by the Attorney General or a district attorney or by a county counsel authorized by agreement with the district attorney in actions involving
 violation of a county ordinance, or by a city attorney of a city having a population in excess of 750,000, or by a city attorney in a city and county or, with the consent of the district attorney, by a city prosecutor in a city having a full-time city prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California upon their own complaint or upon the complaint of a board, officer, person, corporation, or association, or upon a complaint by a person who has suffered injury in fact and has lost money or property as a result of the violation of this chapter.

(d) Court costs recovered pursuant to this section shall be paid to the party or parties that prosecuted the violation. Penalties recovered pursuant to this section shall be paid to the individual to whom the genetic data at issue pertains.

(e) Any provision of a contract or agreement between a consumer and a person governed by
 this chapter that has, or would have, the effect of delaying or limiting access to a legal remedy for a violation of this chapter shall not apply to the exercise of rights or enforcement pursuant to this chapter.

(f) Each violation of this chapter is a separate and actionable violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 596, Sec. 2.   (SB 41)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

56.184.

(a) The provisions of this chapter shall not reduce a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company’s duties, obligations, requirements, or standards under any applicable state and federal laws for the protection of privacy and security.

(b) In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this chapter and any other law, the provisions of the law that afford the greatest protection for the right of privacy for consumers shall control. 

(c) This chapter shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Medical information governed by the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act, Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56),
 or to protected health information that is collected, maintained, used, or disclosed by a covered entity or business associate governed by the privacy, security, and breach notification rules issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations established pursuant to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191) and the federal Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (Public Law 111-5).

(2) A provider of health care governed by the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56)) or a covered entity governed by the privacy, security, and breach notification rules issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, established pursuant to the Health Insurance Portability and
 Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191) and the federal Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act, Title XIII of the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), to the extent that the provider or covered entity maintains, uses, and discloses genetic information in the same manner as medical information or protected health information, as described in paragraph (1).

(3) A business associate of a covered entity governed by the privacy, security, and data breach notification rules issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, established pursuant to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191) and the federal Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act, Title XIII of the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
 (Public Law 111-5), to the extent that the business associate maintains, uses, and discloses genetic information in the same manner as medical information or protected health information, as described in paragraph (1).
